Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 6
REGISTRATION, ENFORCEMENT, AND MODIFICATION
OF SUPPORT ORDER

INTRODUCTORY COMMENT

Sections 601 through 604 establish the basic procedure for the registration of a support order from another state or a foreign support order. Under RURESA when a tribunal of a responding state was requested to register and enforce an existing child-support order, the common practice was to ignore the request; rather, a separate proceeding would be initiated for the establishment of a new support order. This practice was specifically rejected by UIFSA; this practice under RURESA created the multiple support-order system that UIFSA was specifically designed to eliminate. Under Sections 205 through 207 the one-order system allows only one existing order to be enforced prospectively.

Sections 605 through 608 provide the procedure for the nonregistering party to contest registration of an order, either because the order is allegedly invalid, superseded, or no longer in effect, or because the enforcement remedy being sought is opposed by the nonregistering party. Other enforcement remedies may be available without resort to the UIFSA process under the law of the responding state.

See

Section 104.

The registration and enforcement provisions in Sections 601 through 608 are consistent with the "recognition and enforcement" provisions of the Convention. The terms of this article and Article 7 suffice to direct international support orders into the proper channels.